District of Columbia statutes.
24-211.03

Transfer of duties, powers and materials of Board of Public Welfare.

With respect to the said institutions, the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall succeed to all the powers and authority, and to all the duties and obligations vested in or imposed by law upon the Board of Public Welfare of the District of Columbia. Where powers are vested in or duties are imposed by existing law upon the Director of Public Welfare of the District of Columbia with respect to said institutions, such powers and duties are transferred to and shall be exercised by the Director of the Department of Corrections. The officers and employees and all plant and equipment, official records, furniture, and supplies of the said institutions are hereby transferred to the Department of Corrections.

June 27, 1946, 60 Stat. 321, ch. 507, § 3
1981 Ed., § 24-443.
1973 Ed., § 24-443.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.